Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
832

UNIFORM
CRIMINAL EXTRADITION ACT

Section

832-1 Definitions

832-2 Fugitives from justice; duty of governor

832-3 Form of demand

832-4 Governor may investigate case

832-5 Extradition of persons imprisoned or
awaiting trial in

any state or who have left the demanding
state under

compulsion

832-6 Extradition of persons not present in
demanding state

at time of commission of crime

832-7 Issue of governor's warrant of arrest; its
recitals

832-8 Manner and place of execution

832-9 Authority of arresting officer

832-10 Rights of accused person; application for
writ of

habeas corpus

832-11 Penalty

832-12 Confinement in jail when necessary

832-13 Arrest prior to requisition

832-14 Arrest without a warrant

832-15 Commitment to await requisition; bail

832-16 Bail; in what cases; conditions of bond

832-17 Extension of time of commitment;
adjournment

832-18 Forfeiture of bail

832-19 Persons under criminal prosecution in this
State at

time of requisition

832-20 Guilt or innocence of accused, when
inquired into

832-21 Governor may recall warrant or issue alias

832-22 Fugitives from this State; duty of
governor

832-23 Application for issuance of requisition;
by whom made;

contents

832-24 Immunity from service of process in
certain civil

actions

832-25 Written waiver of extradition proceedings

832-26 Nonwaiver by this State

832-27 No right of asylum; no immunity from other
criminal

prosecutions while in this State

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next